en: Sailboat type: Catamaran; Cutter; Sloop; Trimaran; Yawl; Other
nl: Type zeilboot: Catamaran; Kotter; Sloep; Trimaran; Yawl; Andere
it: Tipo di barca a vela: Catamarano; Cutter; Sloop; Trimarano; Iolla; Altro
ja: ヨットの種類: カタマラン; カッター; スループ; トリマラン; ヨール; その他
pt-BR: Tipo de veleiro: Catamarã; Cúter; Corveta; Trimarã; Yawl; Outro
sl-SI: Vrsta jadrnice: Katamaran; Kuter; Šalupa; Trimaran; Jola; Drugo
de: Typ des Segelboots: Katamaran; Kutter; Schaluppe; Trimaran; Jolle; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Тип платноходка: Катамаран; Катер; Шлюп; Тримаран; Ял; Други
tr: Yelkenli tipi: Katamaran; Kesici; Sloop; Trimaran; Filika; Diğer
hu: Vitorláshajó típusa: Katamarán; Cutter; Lapos fenekű bárka; Trimaran; Yawl; Egyéb
es: Tipo de bote: Catamarán; Cortador; Balandra; Trimarán; Yola; Otros
nb: Seilbåttype: Katamaran; Kutter; Slupp; Trimaran; Yawl; Annet
hr-HR: Vrsta jedrilice: Katamaran; Kuter; Slup; Trimaran; Jol; Ostalo
pl: Typ żaglówki: Katamaran; Obcinak; Slup; Trimaran; Jol; Inne
ko: 범선 유형: 쌍동선; 커터; 슬루프; 트리마란; 돛단배; 기타
da: Sejlbådstype: Katamaran; Kutter; Slup; Trimaran; Yawl; Andet
el: Τύπος ιστιοφόρου: Καταμαράν; Κότερο; Μονοκάταρτο ιστιοπλοϊκό; Τριμαράν; Δικάταρτο ιστιοφόρο; Άλλο
zh-CN: 帆船型: 游艇; 独桅纵帆船; 单桅帆船; 三体船; 高低桅帆船; 其他
fi: Purjevenetyyppi: Katamaraani; Kutteri; Sluuppi; Trimaraani; Jooli; Muu
cs: Typ plachetnice: Katamarán; Kutr; Šalupa; Trimarán; Jola; Jiné
th: ประเภทเรือใบ: เรือคาตามารัน; เรือหัวขุด; เรือสลุบ; เรือสามลอน; เรือกรรเชียง; อื่นๆ
sv: Segelbåtstyp: Katamaran; Cutter; Slup; Trimaran; Yawl; Övrigt
vi: Loại thuyền buồm: Thuyền buồm hai thâ; Thuyền một cột buồm; Thuyền một buồm; Thuyền ba thân; Thuyền yôn; Khác
ru: Тип парусного судна: Катамаран; Катер; Шлюпка; Тримаран; Ял; Другой
zh-TW: 帆船類型: 雙體船; 刀具; 單桅帆船; 三體船; 高低桅帆船; 其他
lt-LT: Burinės valties tipas: Katamaranas; Kateris; Vienstiebė; Trimaranas; Jolas; Kita
pt-PT: Tipo de barco à vela: Catamarã; Cúter; Chalupa; Trimarã; Veleiro Yawl; Outro
sk-SK: Typ plachetnice: Katamarán; Rezačka; Šalupa; Trimaran; Jačať; Iné
ro-RO: Tip barcă cu vele: Catamaran; Trei vele; Două vele; Trimaran; Yawl; Altele
fr: Type de voilier: Catamaran; Coupeur; Sloop; Trimaran; Yawl; Autre